Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.280

Unanticipated receipts—Duty of governor on approval.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, if the governor approves such estimate in whole or part, he or she shall endorse on each copy of the statement his or her approval, together with a statement of the amount approved in the form of an allotment amendment, and transmit one copy to the head of the department, agency, board, or commission authorizing the expenditure. An identical copy of the governor's statement of approval and a statement of the amount approved for expenditure shall be transmitted simultaneously to the joint legislative audit and review committee and also to the standing committee on ways and means of the house and senate of all executive approvals of proposals to expend money in excess of appropriations provided by law.

(2) If the governor approves an estimate with transportation funding implications, in whole or part, he or she shall endorse on each copy of the statement his or her approval, together with a statement of the amount approved in the form of an allotment amendment, and transmit one copy to the head of the department, agency, board, or commission authorizing the expenditure. An identical copy of the governor's statement of approval of a proposal to expend transportation money in excess of appropriations provided by law and a statement of the amount approved for expenditure must be transmitted simultaneously to the standing committees on transportation of the house and senate.

(3) During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, before the governor may approve a proposed allotment amendment impacting the operating, capital, or transportation budget as provided in RCW 43.79.270(3), the governor must provide the joint legislative unanticipated revenue oversight committee 14 calendar days from submittal to review and comment on the proposal. If the governor approves a proposed allotment amendment that the committee rejected or is not modified to reflect the committee's alternative allotment amendment, the governor must submit a written explanation of the reasoning of such action to the joint legislative unanticipated revenue oversight committee within five days of approval. To change the amount, use, or purpose of an approved allotment amendment under this subsection, the head of any department, agency, board, or commission must request the change using the process provided in RCW 43.79.270(3). For all other changes, if the governor approves the change, a copy of the statement of approval must be sent to the joint legislative unanticipated revenue oversight committee.

[ 2021 c 334 s 973; 2009 c 549 s 5150; 2005 c 319 s 106; 1998 c 177 s 2; 1996 c 288 s 38; 1973 c 144 s 3; 1965 c 8 s 43.79.280. Prior: 1945 c 243 s 5; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 5517-14.]

NOTES:

Conflict with federal requirements—Effective date—2021 c 334: See notes following RCW 43.79.555.

Findings—Intent—Part headings—Effective dates—2005 c 319: See notes following RCW 43.17.020.